Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 84

STANDARDS
OF CONDUCT

Preamble

Part I. General Provisions

Section

84-1 Construction

84-2 Applicability

84-3 Definitions

Part II. Code of Ethics

84-11 Gifts

84-11.5 Reporting of gifts

84-12 Confidential information

84-13 Fair treatment

84-13.5 Washington Place; campaign activities

84-14 Conflicts of interests

84-15 Contracts

84-16 Contracts voidable

84-17 Requirements of disclosure

84-17.5 Disclosure files; disposition

84-18 Restrictions on post employment

84-19 Violation

Part III. State Ethics Commission

84-21 State ethics commission established;
composition

Part IV. Administration and Enforcement

84-31 Duties of commission; complaint, hearing,

determination

84-31.3 Filing of false charges

84-31.5 Repealed

84-32 Procedure

84-33 Disciplinary action for violation

84-34 No compensation

84-35 Staff

84-35.5 Prohibition from political activity

84-36 Cooperation

84-37 Concurrent jurisdiction

84-38 Judicial branch

84-39 Administrative fines

Part V. Mandatory Ethics Training

84-41 Applicability of part

84-42 Mandatory ethics training course

84-43 Ethics training course

Historical Note

Source notes for each section of this chapter start with L
1972, c 163, which completely amended this chapter. For prior law, see L 1967,
c 263 and L 1968, c 21.

Attorney General Opinions

As long as the mandatory topics listed in the third paragraph
of article XIV of the Hawaii State Constitution are addressed, the legislature
exercises discretion over what specific conduct is prohibited, permitted, or
otherwise regulated under the state ethics code. Assuming no other state or
federal constitutional provision is brought into play, the legislature may
exempt certain conduct from the state ethics code or otherwise subject it to
related regulation, such as disclosure requirements. Att. Gen. Op. 15-2.

The state ethics code must apply to all state employees;
individual employees may not be exempted from the state ethics code. Att. Gen.
Op. 15-2.

Law Journals and Reviews

Confidentiality Breeds Contempt: A First Amendment Challenge
to Confidential Ethics Commission Proceedings of the City & County of Honolulu. 18 UH L. Rev. 797.

Case Notes

Although an application of §84-13 was necessary to decide the
union's complaint under §89-13, it could not be said that the question arose
under this chapter; where union filed the complaint with the labor relations
board under §89-19, the board had "exclusive original jurisdiction"
to determine prohibited practice complaints and the ethics commission would not
have had jurisdiction to make that determination; thus, the board had the power
to apply §84-13 in order to decide whether a prohibited practice violation
actually occurred and it did not exceed its jurisdiction in ruling that a
violation did not occur based on the application of §84-13. 116 H. 73, 170
P.3d 324.

PREAMBLE

The purpose of this chapter is to (1) prescribe
a code of ethics for elected officers and public employees of the State as
mandated by the people of the State of Hawaii in the Hawaii constitution, article
XIV; (2) educate the citizenry with respect to ethics in government; and (3)
establish an ethics commission which will administer the codes of ethics
adopted by the constitutional convention and by the legislature and render
advisory opinions and enforce the provisions of this law so that public
confidence in public servants will be preserved. [L 1972, c 163, pt of §1; am L
1979, c 91, §2; am L 1981, c 82, §10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next